Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1061XS (2) 91 da/ns S.F. 9 Section 1. Section 137F.6, subsection 1, paragraph g, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 g. (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (2), for a food 4 processing plant, the annual license fee shall correspond to 5 the annual gross food and beverage sales of the food processing 6 plant, as follows: 7 (a) For annual gross sales of less than two hundred thousand 8 dollars, one hundred fifty dollars. 9 (b) For annual gross sales of at least two hundred thousand 10 dollars but less than two million dollars, three hundred 11 dollars. 12 (c) For annual gross sales of two million dollars or more, 13 five hundred dollars. 14 (2) For a food processing plant operating on the premises of 15 a farm or private residence that stores officially processed, 16 packaged meat or poultry derived from animals raised by the 17 licensee and offered for sale directly to consumers or to 18 another business, the license fee is seventy-five dollars. 19